California statutes. Financial Code
Article 3 (commencing with Section 640), Chapter 5 of the revised Banking Law applies to any distribution to its shareholders made after January 1, 1979, by a subject institution existing on January 1, 1979, except that any such distribution effected pursuant to a contract for the purchase or redemption of shares entered into by such subject institution prior to January 1, 1979, may be made if permissible under the applicable provisions of the revised Banking Law and the new General
 Corporation Law or under the applicable provisions of the prior Banking Law and the prior General Corporation Law in effect at the time such contract was entered into.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Department of Financial Protection and Innovation [300. - 414.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [300. - 301.]

300.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Business and industrial development corporation” means a corporation licensed under Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000).

(2) “Payment instrument” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2003.

(3) “Stored Value” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (x) of Section 2003.

(b) There is in the state government, in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, a Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, which has charge of the execution of, among other laws, the laws of this state relating to any of the following: (1) banks or trust companies or the banking or trust business; (2) savings associations or the savings association business; (3) credit unions or the credit union business; (4) persons who engage in the business of receiving money for transmission or such business; (5) issuers of stored value or such business; (6) issuers of payment instruments or the payment instrument business; (7) business and industrial development corporations or the business and industrial development corporation business; (8) insurance premium finance agencies or the insurance premium finance business; (9) persons offering or making any contract constituting bucketing; (10)
 persons offering or selling off-exchange commodities; (11) deferred deposit originators; (12) finance lenders and brokers; (13) residential mortgage lenders and servicers; (14) capital access companies; (15) check sellers, bill payers, and proraters; (16) securities issuers, broker-dealers, agents, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives; (17) mortgage loan originators employed or supervised by finance lenders or residential mortgage lenders; (18) escrow agents; (19) franchisors; (20) persons holding securities as custodians on behalf of securities owners; (21) persons offering or providing consumer financial products or services in this state; and (22) PACE program administrators.

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 15.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

(a) This chapter is applicable to this division, Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000), Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800), Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000), Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), and Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this article, and Articles 2 (commencing with Section 320) and 3 (commencing with Section 350) are applicable to the administration of laws by the Division of Corporations.

(c) Sections 329, 330, 332, 335, 336, 357, 378, 379, and 381 are not applicable to the Division of
 Corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 47.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation [320. - 338.]

320.

(a) The chief officer of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation is the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation. The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is the head of the department with the authority and responsibility over all officers, employees, and activities in the department and, except as otherwise provided in this code and the Corporations Code, is subject to the provisions of the Government Code relating to department heads.

(b) The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation shall employ legal counsel to act as the attorney for the commissioner in actions or proceedings brought by or against the commissioner under or pursuant to any law under the jurisdiction of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or in which the commissioner joins or intervenes as to a matter within the jurisdiction of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, as a friend of the court or otherwise.

(c) The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation shall employ stenographic reporters to take and transcribe the testimony in any formal hearing or investigation before the commissioner or before a person authorized by the commissioner.

(d) Sections 11040 and 11042 of the Government Code do not apply to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

(a) In this section, “order” means any approval, consent, authorization, exemption, denial, prohibition, requirement, or other administrative action, applicable to a specific case.

(b) Upon the operative date of this section, as amended during the 2019–20 legislative session, the office of the Commissioner of Business Oversight and the Department of Business Oversight shall be renamed the office of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation. All powers, duties, responsibilities, and functions of the Commissioner of Business Oversight and the Department of Business Oversight shall be the powers, duties, responsibilities, and functions of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, respectively. The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall retain all of the rights, property, debts, and liability of the Commissioner of Business Oversight and the Department of Business Oversight, respectively. The change of name shall not affect the validity of any action or proceeding by or against the Commissioner of Business Oversight or the Department of Business Oversight, or a predecessor commissioner or department, nor the validity of any permit, certificate, license, or any other action taken under the name of the Commissioner of Business Oversight or the Department of Business Oversight, or a predecessor commissioner or department. All agreements entered into with, and orders and regulations issued by, the Commissioner of Business Oversight or the Department of Business Oversight, or a predecessor commissioner or department, shall continue in effect as agreements, orders, and regulations of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation. References in the California Constitution or in any statute or regulation to the Superintendent of Banks or the Commissioner of Financial Institutions or the Commissioner of Corporations or the Commissioner of Business Oversight or to the State Banking Department or the Department of Financial Institutions or the Department of Corporations or the Department of Business Oversight mean the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, respectively.

(c) (1) The name change of the Department of Business Oversight to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall not result in any change to the status or authority of the department.

(2) (A) All appointments by the Governor to the Department of Business Oversight shall continue as appointments to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(B) The confirmation by the Senate of the Commissioner and Senior Deputy
 Commissioner of Business Oversight for the Division of Corporations shall remain in effect as confirmation by the Senate of the Commissioner and Senior Deputy Commissioner of Corporations and Financial Institutions to the renamed Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 3.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

The commissioner is appointed by the Governor, and holds office at the pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the commissioner is subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

The commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state for at least three years prior to his or her appointment. The commissioner shall be chosen solely for his or her qualifications and fitness to perform the duties of his or her office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

The annual salary of the commissioner is provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, the commissioner shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and file the same with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

(a) The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is responsible for the performance of all duties, the exercise of all powers and jurisdiction, and the assumption and discharge of all responsibilities vested by law in the department and the divisions thereunder. The commissioner has and may exercise all the powers necessary or convenient for the administration and enforcement of, among other laws, the laws described in Section 300. The commissioner may issue rules and regulations consistent with law as the commissioner may deem necessary or advisable in executing the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department.

(b) In addition to the authority under subdivision (a), the commissioner may bring a civil action or other appropriate proceeding, pursuant to Section 5552 of Title 12 of the United States Code, to enforce the provisions of the Consumer Financial Protection Act of 2010 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 5481 et seq.), or regulations issued by the federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau thereunder, with respect to an entity that is licensed, registered, or subject to oversight by the commissioner, and to secure remedies under provisions of the Consumer Financial Protection Act of 2010.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand upon or limit the authority granted by Section 5552 of Title 12 of the United States Code (Section 1042 of Subtitle D of Title X of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 4.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

(a) The commissioner shall apply the Interagency Guidance on Nontraditional Mortgage Product Risks issued in September 2006 and the Statement on Subprime Mortgage Lending issued in June 2007 by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of Thrift Supervision, and the National Credit Union Administration to state-regulated financial institutions, including,
 but not limited to, privately insured, state-chartered credit unions.

(b) The commissioner may issue emergency and final regulations to clarify the application of this section as soon as possible.

(c) A bank or credit union to which the commissioner applies the documents described in subdivision (a) shall adopt and adhere to policies and procedures that are reasonably intended to achieve the objectives set forth in those documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

(a) The commissioner may make the agreements that he or she deems necessary or appropriate in exercising his or her powers.

(b) (1) The agreements authorized under subdivision (a) may include, but are not limited to, agreements with agencies of this state, of other states of the United States, of the United States, or of foreign nations that regulate financial institutions,
 relating to examinations of banks, savings associations, credit unions, industrial loan companies, and other matters.

(2) Any agreement with a government agency that regulates financial institutions is exempt from the advertising and competitive bidding requirements of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Applicable law” means:

(A) With respect to any bank, Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800), and any of the following provisions:

(i) Article 6 (commencing with Section 405) of Chapter 3.

(ii) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1130) of Chapter 5 of Division 1.1.

(iii) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 1.1.

(iv) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320)
 of Division 1.1.

(v) Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1460) of Division 1.1.

(vi) Article 1 (commencing with Section 1530) of Chapter 15 of Division 1.1.

(vii) Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1550) of Division 1.1.

(viii) Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of Division 1.1.

(ix) Section 456.

(x) Section 457.

(xi) Section 459.

(xii) Section 460.

(xiii) Section 461.

(xiv) Section 1331.

(xv) Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 1.1.

(xvi) Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 1660) of Division 1.1.

(xvii) Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670) of Division 1.1.

(B) With respect to any savings association, any provision of Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800) and Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000).

(C) With respect to any insurance premium finance agency, any provision of Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000).

(D) With respect to any business and industrial development corporation, any provision of Division 15 (commencing with Section
 31000).

(E) With respect to any credit union, any of the following provisions:

(i) Section 14252.

(ii) Section 14253.

(iii) Section 14255.

(iv) Article 4 (commencing with Section 14350) of Chapter 3 of Division 5.

(v) Section 14401.

(vi) Section 14404.

(vii) Section 14408, only as that section applies to gifts to directors, volunteers, and employees, and the related family or business interests of the directors, volunteers, and employees.

(viii) Section 14409.

(ix) Section 14410.

(x) Article 5 (commencing with Section 14600) of Chapter 4 of Division 5.

(xi) Article 6 (commencing with Section 14650) of Chapter 4 of Division 5, excluding subdivision (a) of Section 14651.

(xii) Section 14803.

(xiii) Section 14851.

(xiv) Section 14858.

(xv) Section 14860.

(xvi) Section 14861.

(xvii) Section 14863.

(F) With respect to any money transmitter, any provision of Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000).

(2) “Licensee” means any bank, savings association, credit union, trust company, money transmitter, insurance premium finance agency, or business and industrial development corporation that is authorized by the commissioner to conduct business in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code that applies to a licensee or a subsidiary of a licensee, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may, by order that shall include findings of fact which incorporates a determination made in accordance with subdivision (e), levy civil penalties against any licensee or any subsidiary of a licensee who has violated any provision of applicable law, any order issued by the commissioner, any
 written agreement between the commissioner and the licensee or subsidiary of the licensee, or any condition of any approval issued by the commissioner. The commissioner shall have the sole authority to bring any action with respect to a violation of applicable law subject to a penalty imposed under this section.

Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), any penalty imposed by the commissioner may not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) a day, provided that the aggregate penalty of all offenses in any one action against any licensee or subsidiary of a licensee shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(1) If the commissioner determines that any licensee or subsidiary of the licensee has recklessly violated any applicable law, any order issued by the commissioner, any provision of any written agreement between the commissioner and the licensee or subsidiary, or any condition of any approval
 issued by the commissioner, the commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day, provided that the aggregate penalty of all offenses in an action against any licensee or subsidiary of a licensee shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(2) If the commissioner determines that any licensee or subsidiary of the licensee has knowingly violated any applicable law, any order issued by the commissioner, any provision of any written agreement between the commissioner and the licensee or subsidiary, or any condition of any approval issued by the commissioner, the commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day, provided that the aggregate penalty of all offenses in an action against any licensee or subsidiary of a licensee shall not exceed 1 percent of the total assets of the licensee or subsidiary of a licensee subject to the penalty.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the commissioner from pursuing any other administrative action allowed by law.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the commissioner from bringing an action in court to enforce any law or order he or she has issued, including orders issued under this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the commissioner from seeking any other damages or injunction allowed by law.

(e) In determining the amount and the appropriateness of initiating a civil money penalty under subdivision (b), the commissioner shall consider all of the following:

(1) Evidence that the violation or practice or breach of duty was intentional or was committed with a
 disregard of the law or with a disregard of the consequences to the institution.

(2) The duration and frequency of the violations, practices, or breaches of duties.

(3) The continuation of the violations, practices, or breaches of duty after the licensee or subsidiary of the licensee was notified, or, alternatively, its immediate cessation and correction.

(4) The failure to cooperate with the commissioner in effecting early resolution of the problem.

(5) Evidence of concealment of the violation, practice, or breach of duty or, alternatively, voluntary disclosure of the violation, practice, or breach of duty.

(6) Any threat of loss, actual loss, or other harm to the institution, including
 harm to the public confidence in the institution, and the degree of that harm.

(7) Evidence that a licensee or subsidiary of a licensee received financial gain or other benefit as a result of the violation, practice, or breach of duty.

(8) Evidence of any restitution paid by a licensee or subsidiary of a licensee of losses resulting from the violation, practice, or breach of duty.

(9) History of prior violations, practices, or breaches of duty, particularly where they are similar to the actions under consideration.

(10) Previous criticism of the institution for similar actions.

(11) Presence or absence of a compliance program and its effectiveness.

(12) Tendency to engage in violations of law, unsafe or unsound financial institutions practices, or breaches of duties.

(13) The existence of agreements, commitments, orders, or conditions imposed in writing intended to prevent the violation, practice, or breach of duty.

(14) Whether the violation, practice, or breach of duty causes quantifiable, economic benefit or loss to the licensee or the subsidiary of the licensee. In those cases, removal of the benefit or recompense of the loss usually will be insufficient, by itself, to promote compliance with the applicable law, order, or written agreement. The penalty amount should reflect a remedial purpose and should provide a deterrent to future misconduct.

(15) Other factors as the commissioner may, in his
 or her opinion, consider relevant to assessing the penalty or establishing the amount of the penalty.

(f) The amounts collected under this section shall be deposited in the appropriate fund of the department. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “appropriate fund” means the fund to which the annual assessments of fined licensees, or the parent licensee of the fined subsidiary, are credited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   (SB 1361)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

330.

The authority vested in the Superintendent of Banks under subdivision (2) of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution is delegated to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

The commissioner may adopt and implement any method of accepting electronic filings of applications, reports, or other matters, which, in the opinion of the commissioner, is secure. Any method of electronic filing chosen by the commissioner shall include a method to verify the identity of the person making the filing. The verification shall be deemed to satisfy all other verifications required by the commissioner, and shall have the same force and effect as the use of manual signatures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   (SB 1361)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

331.5.

(a) (1) A licensee subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction shall establish and maintain an electronic service address designated for receiving communications and documents that are sent by the commissioner to licensees. This electronic service address shall be provided to the commissioner upon licensure. The electronic service address provided to the commissioner shall not be the electronic service address of any individual employee. A licensee shall have the capacity to receive an attachment that accompanies a message sent to its electronic service address, provided the size of the attachment is reasonable in relation to the technology available at the time the attachment is sent.

(2) Prior to changing the electronic
 service address most recently provided to the commissioner, the licensee shall notify the commissioner of the change and provide to the commissioner his or her new electronic service address. The commissioner may impose a fine of up to fifty dollars ($50) per day, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate, on a licensee who fails to notify the commissioner before changing his or her electronic service address or fails to provide the commissioner a new electronic service address.

(3) The commissioner shall provide each licensee that establishes and maintains an electronic service address in accordance with this section with an electronic service address designated for receiving correspondence from licensees subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction. This service address shall have the capacity to receive an attachment that accompanies a message sent by the licensee, provided the size of the attachment is reasonable in
 relation to the technology available at the time the attachment is sent.

(b) A communication sent to an electronic service address established pursuant to this section does not satisfy any notice requirement, or displace any law or regulation, that requires notice to be served in a different manner, if a hearing right attaches to the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 699, Sec. 3.   (SB 1361)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

(a) (1) In this section, “federal law” includes, but is not limited to, the United States Constitution, any federal statute, any federal court decision, and any regulation, circular, bulletin, interpretation, decision, order, and waiver issued by a federal agency.

(2) The definitions set forth in Section 1750 apply to this section.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in subdivision (c), if the commissioner finds that any provision of federal law applicable to national banking associations doing business in this state is substantively different from the provisions of this code applicable to banks organized under the laws of this state, the commissioner may by regulation make that provision of federal law applicable to banks organized under the laws of this state.

(2) If the commissioner finds that any provision of federal law applicable to foreign (other nation) banks with respect to federal agencies or federal branches in this state is substantively different from the provisions of this code applicable to foreign (other nation) banks with respect to agencies or branch offices licensed by the commissioner under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of
 Division 1.1, the commissioner may by regulation make that provision of federal law applicable to foreign (other nation) banks with respect to agencies or branch offices licensed by the commissioner under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of Division 1.1.

(c) (1) Section 11343.4 and Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code do not apply to any regulation adopted under subdivision (b).

(2) The commissioner shall file any regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), together with a citation to this section as authority for the adoption and a citation to the provisions of federal law made applicable by the regulation, with the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of
 Regulations.

(3) Any regulation adopted under subdivision (b) shall become effective on the date when it is filed with the Secretary of State unless the commissioner prescribes a later date in the regulation or in a written instrument filed with the regulation.

(4) Any regulation adopted under subdivision (b) shall expire at 12 p.m. on December 31 of the year following the calendar year in which it becomes effective.

(5) Any regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subject to the following restrictions:

(A) The commissioner shall not renew or reinstate the regulation adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(B) The commissioner shall not adopt a new regulation pursuant to
 subdivision (b), to address the same conformity issue that was addressed by the regulation that expired pursuant to subdivision (c).

(d) The commissioner may adopt regulations pursuant to subdivision (b) that are exempt from the expiration and restrictions of subdivision (c) if the regulations are adopted in compliance with all provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, including those listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

The powers of supervision and examination of all licensees are vested in the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

334.

The commissioner may promulgate or waive such rules and regulations as may be reasonable or necessary to carry out his or her duties and responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

(a) The commissioner, whenever in his or her opinion such action is necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her duties, may call a meeting of the board of directors of a licensee.

(b) A meeting of the board of a licensee called by the commissioner shall be held upon four days’ notice by first-class mail or 24 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone. The notice shall be given by the
 commissioner or, if the commissioner so orders, by an officer of the licensee.

(c) A meeting of the board of a licensee called by the commissioner shall be held at a place within this state as may be designated by the commissioner and specified in the notice of the meeting.

(d) The expenses of a meeting of the board of a licensee called by the commissioner shall be paid by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

The commissioner may, at any time, require a licensee to write down any asset held by the licensee to a valuation that will represent the asset’s then fair market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

337.

(a) The commissioner, when conducting examinations under Section 500, 14250, 16150, or 16700, shall examine a licensee that maintains a correspondent account or payable-through account for compliance with the federal Comprehensive Iran Sanctions, Accountability, and Divestment Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-195), associated federal regulations, and any related presidential executive orders. If the commissioner finds that a licensee is in violation, the commissioner may bring an action in accordance with Section 566, 14302, 16200, or 16900, and shall forward evidence of the violation to the United States Department of the Treasury. For purposes of this section, “correspondent account” and “payable-through account” have the meanings given those terms in Section 5381A of Title 31 of the United States Code.

(b) This section shall become inoperative if both of the following conditions occur:

(1) Iran is removed from the United States Department of State’s list of countries that have been determined to repeatedly provide support for acts of international terrorism.

(2) Pursuant to the appropriate federal statute, the President determines and certifies to the appropriate committee of the United States Congress that Iran has ceased its efforts to design, develop, manufacture, or acquire a nuclear explosive device or related materials and technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 139, Sec. 2.   (AB 978)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Conditionally inoperative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

338.

Upon declaration of a state of emergency, pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) due to a wildfire, including, but not limited to, any unplanned, unwanted wildland fire, including unauthorized human-caused fires, escaped wildland fire use events, escaped prescribed fire projects, and all other wildland fires where the objective is to extinguish the fire, the commissioner shall coordinate with mortgage lenders and servicers subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction,
 including those who lend money in connection with the purchase or financing of a mobilehome as that term is defined in Section 798.3 of the Civil Code, operating in this state to facilitate and monitor the implementation and promotion of mortgage forbearance, foreclosure prevention, and loss mitigation programs available to borrowers who experience a material decrease in household income or a material increase in household expenses due, directly or indirectly, to the wildfire emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 547, Sec. 4.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deputies and Employees [350. - 357.]

350.

The chief deputy shall be appointed by the Governor and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The annual salary of the chief deputy shall be fixed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 50.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

351.

(a) The chief officer of the Division of Corporations and Financial Institutions is the Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Corporations and Financial Institutions. The Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Corporations and Financial Institutions shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation, and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Corporations and Financial Institutions shall receive an annual salary as fixed by the Governor.

(b) The chief officer of the Division of Consumer Financial Protection is the Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Consumer Financial Protection. The Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Consumer Financial Protection shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation, and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The Senior Deputy Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation for the Division of Consumer Financial Protection shall receive an annual salary as fixed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 157, Sec. 5.   (AB 1864)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

352.

The commissioner may employ deputies in addition to the chief deputy, and examiners, appraisers, technical assistants, investigators, administrative assistants, clerks, and other employees that he or she may need to discharge in a proper manner the duties imposed upon him or her by law. He or she shall prescribe their duties and fix their compensation in accordance with classifications made by the State Personnel Board. The commissioner may also, at those times and on those terms as may
 be approved by the Governor, employ those attorneys as he or she may need.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office each deputy and examiner shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 53.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

The commissioner may require, at any time, of any deputy, examiner, or other employee of the department, an official bond in such amount as the commissioner may deem necessary. The premium for bonds required by the commissioner shall be an expense of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Senior Deputy Commissioner of the Division of Financial Institutions, or any deputy or employee of the Division of Financial Institutions shall not do or be any of the following with respect to any bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company supervised by the department:

(a) Be indebted, directly or indirectly, as borrower, endorser, surety, or guarantor to any such bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company.

(b) Be an officer, director, or employee of any such bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company.

(c) Own or deal in
 directly or indirectly, the shares or obligations of any such bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company.

(d) Be interested in or, directly or indirectly, receive from any such bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company or any officer, director, or employee thereof, any salary, fee, compensation, or other valuable thing by way of gift, credit, compensation for services, or otherwise. However, this subdivision does not prohibit any person from being interested in or directly or indirectly receiving (1) anything which is expressly excluded from a definition of “gift” or “honorarium” in the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code) or in regulations issued under the Political Reform Act of 1974 by the Fair Political Practices Commission or (2) anything which, if received by the commissioner, would constitute a gift or honorarium within the meaning
 of the Political Reform Act of 1974 or regulations issued under the Political Reform Act of 1974 by the Fair Political Practices Commission but which the commissioner would not be prohibited from receiving under the Political Reform Act of 1974 or regulations issued under the Political Reform Act of 1974 by the Fair Political Practices Commission.

(e) Be interested in or engage in the negotiation of any loan to, obligation of, or accommodation for another person to or with any such bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company.

Notwithstanding the foregoing the commissioner and any deputy or employee may have and maintain one or more deposit or similar accounts in any bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company in this state and may maintain with any bank, savings association, credit union, or industrial loan company in this state a loan which was not
 obtained in violation of this section if the person reports the loan in writing to the department within 30 days after the person commences their term of appointment or employment with the department and if the loan is not renewed, renegotiated, extended, or otherwise modified on or after July 1, 1997.

A violation of this section by any person shall constitute sufficient grounds for their removal or discharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 100.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

356.
